Utah statutes.
70A-2a-203.   Seals inoperative.

The affixing of a seal to a writing evidencing a lease contract or an offer to enter into a lease contract does not render the writing a sealed instrument and the law with respect to sealed instruments does not apply to the lease contract or offer.



Enacted by Chapter 197, 1990 General Session

